src/fst/stems/adpositions.lexc
!! Adpositions
!  ----------
!! Adpositions in the Ter Sami language describe things.

LEXICON ambip
+Ap: # ;

LEXICON postp
+Po: # ;

LEXICON Adpositions
альн    postp ; 
гуэйкэ  postp ;
э̄л      postp ;
мӣлльтэ postp "с кем-чем" ;
эвтэсьт ambip "в дальнейшем" ;!<э̄ввт
